Utah statutes.
63B-10-114.   Tax exemption.

The bonds issued under this chapter, any interest paid on the bonds, and any income from the bonds are not taxable in this state for any purpose, except for the corporate franchise tax.



Enacted by Chapter 321, 2001 General Session

